Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 6. CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS

CHAPTER 68. TABULATION OF UNOFFICIAL RESULTS OF CERTAIN RACES BY SECRETARY OF STATE

SUBCHAPTER A. CONDUCT OF TABULATION

Sec. 68.001. DUTY TO TABULATE GENERALLY. (a) The secretary of state shall tabulate the unofficial results as provided by this subchapter in each primary election and general election for state and county officers on each proposed amendment to the state constitution and for each contested race for nomination or election to:

(1) a federal office or statewide office of the state government;

(2) the office of state senator;

(3) the office of state representative; and

(4) the office of member, State Board of Education.

(b) The secretary may tabulate the unofficial results for other contested races, political party referenda, and any special elections ordered by the governor.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.002. ACCESS TO TABULATION SYSTEM. (a) During the tabulation, the secretary of state shall provide a sufficient number of display terminals for representatives of the news media to monitor the tabulation. The secretary shall provide direct lines between computers for use by the media, if practicable.

(b) The secretary shall charge reasonable fees, which shall approximate actual costs, to defray the costs of providing the news media access to the tabulation system.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.003. DISPLAY TERMINALS FOR CERTAIN STATE OFFICERS. (a) For monitoring the tabulations, the secretary of state shall provide display terminals without charge to the governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives in their Capitol offices. The secretary shall also provide printers at those locations if printers are made available at any location.

(b) The officers who are provided terminals or printers under this section may not provide access to data from those terminals or printers to members of the working news media.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.004. PERIODIC REPORTS DURING TABULATION. (a) Periodically during the tabulation, the secretary of state shall publish reports covering the races being tabulated.

(b) The periodic reports may include:

(1) vote totals for all contested races being tabulated;

(2) vote totals by county for federal offices and statewide offices of the state government;

(3) vote totals for federal offices and statewide offices of the state government in each of the six most populous counties, the total for the next 19 most populous counties, and the total for the remaining 229 counties; and

(4) any other information the secretary of state determines to be relevant.

(c) The secretary shall distribute the periodic reports on publication to the participating news media.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.005. FINAL REPORTS OF TABULATION. (a) After completion of the tabulation, the secretary of state shall publish a final report covering the races being tabulated.

(b) The final report may include:

(1) the information described by Section 68.004(b);

(2) vote totals by county for all races being tabulated; and

(3) vote totals for federal offices and statewide offices of the state government in a minimum of eight regions designated by the secretary on the basis of the geographic scope of the electronic media markets.

(c) The secretary shall distribute a copy of the final report on publication to the participating news media, governor, lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and members of the elections advisory committee. A copy of the report shall also be furnished to other persons on payment of a reasonable fee prescribed by the secretary to defray the costs of preparing and furnishing the copy.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.006. REPORT OF RECEIPT OF COUNTY RESULTS. The secretary of state shall publish a report indicating the times the first and last reports of results from each county were received by the secretary.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.007. POSTING REPORTS FOR PUBLIC INSPECTION. (a) The secretary of state shall post for public inspection, on publication, one copy of each report published under Section 68.004.

(b) The secretary of state may post for public inspection any of the reports prepared under this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.008. BACKUP SYSTEM. The secretary of state shall provide a backup system for the tabulation of the results.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.009. OPERATIONS MANUAL. Not later than the 90th day before the date of each election covered by this subchapter, the secretary of state shall prepare an operations manual that explains the procedures to be used by the secretary in tabulating the results.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.010. DISPOSITION OF FUNDS. Funds collected under this chapter may be appropriated only to the secretary of state for the administration of this chapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.011. ADDITIONAL PROCEDURES PRESCRIBED BY SECRETARY OF STATE. The secretary of state shall prescribe any additional procedures necessary to implement the tabulation of unofficial results.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

SUBCHAPTER B. DUTIES OF LOCAL ELECTION OFFICIALS FOR CERTAIN RACES

Sec. 68.031. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies to each election covered by Subchapter A in addition to and notwithstanding other provisions of this code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.032. DELIVERY OF RETURNS AND VOTED BALLOTS. (a) In precincts using paper ballots, voting machines, or electronic voting system ballot counters, the copy of the returns required to be delivered to the county clerk shall be delivered not later than two hours, or as soon thereafter as practicable, after the closing of the polls or after the last person voted, whichever is later.

(b) In a precinct using electronic voting system ballots to be counted at a central counting station, the ballots shall be delivered to the station not later than two hours, or as soon thereafter as practicable, after the closing of the polls or after the last person voted, whichever is later. The copy of the returns required to be delivered to the county clerk shall be delivered by the presiding judge of the counting station immediately on completion of the returns.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.033. COUNTING OF EARLY VOTING BALLOTS. The early voting ballot board shall count the early voting ballots periodically throughout the day.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.53; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 68.034. TRANSMISSION OF RESULTS TO SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) The county clerk shall transmit periodically, by telephone or other electronic means, to the secretary of state the results for the races being tabulated by the secretary. The results shall be transmitted continuously until complete.

(b) The county clerk shall transmit the complete or partial results of the early voting for the appropriate races at 7 p.m. on election day. If only partial results are available, the results shall be transmitted periodically until complete.

(c) Costs of transmission of the results may be paid by the state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.54; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER C. ELECTIONS ADVISORY COMMITTEE

Sec. 68.051. MEMBERSHIP. (a) Not later than January 1 of each even-numbered year, the lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and secretary of state shall each appoint six persons to serve on an elections advisory committee in connection with the tabulation and reporting of election results under this chapter.

(b) Each member of the committee serves a two-year term beginning on January 1 of even-numbered years.

(c) Appointments to the committee shall be made without regard to race, creed, sex, religion, and national origin.

(d) Instead of making one of the required appointments, each appointing officer or the officer's designee may serve on the committee.

(e) Each appointing officer shall allocate at least four of the officer's appointments among members of the various media organizations covering elections in this state.

(f) The following persons or their designees shall also serve on the committee:

(1) the president of the Texas Association of Broadcasters;

(2) the president of the Texas Press Association;

(3) the president of the Texas Daily Newspaper Association; and

(4) the chief state executive officers of the Associated Press and United Press International.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 67, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1107 (H.B. 2309), Sec. 1.16(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 68.052. CHAIR AND MEETINGS. (a) The secretary of state shall designate a chair and vice chair of the committee from among the media organization membership.

(b) Meetings of the committee shall be held at the call of the chair.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 68, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 68.053. REVIEW OF OPERATIONS MANUAL. The committee shall review the operations manual prepared under Section 68.009 and make any recommendations it considers appropriate.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.054. MEMBERS PRESENT DURING TABULATION. One or more members chosen by the committee shall be present during the tabulation of the results at each election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 68.055. EVALUATION AND RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING TABULATION. The committee shall submit a written report after each election to the secretary of state, governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives evaluating the tabulation process and making any recommendations it considers appropriate.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.